Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.075

Medical gas piping installer endorsement.

The department shall adopt requirements that qualify a journey level plumber to be issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement.

[ 2013 c 23 s 20; 1997 c 326 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 326: See note following RCW 18.106.010.